Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,111
Establishment; when; court of record.

Each county of this state having a population of seventy-five thousand or more inhabitants shall constitute a separate juvenile court judicial district. There shall be established in each such juvenile court judicial district of this state a separate juvenile court whenever the establishment thereof shall be authorized by a majority of the electors of any such county voting thereon. The court so established shall be a court of record.

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 1, p. 683;

Laws 1976, LB 669, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-228;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 68;

Laws 1984, LB 973, § 1.

If the State wishes to rely on evidence from dispositional proceedings to support a termination based on failed efforts at rehabilitation, it must see that a verbatim record is made so that the testimony and other foundation evidence is preserved; otherwise, there can be no meaningful review by the Supreme Court. In re Interest of R.A., 226 Neb. 160, 410 N.W.2d 110 (1987).

Probation officers are provided to carry out the work of the separate juvenile court. Beck v. Beck, 175 Neb. 108, 120 N.W.2d 585 (1963).

Constitutionality of Separate Juvenile Court Act could only be raised in proceeding brought directly for that purpose. State ex rel. Weiner v. Hans, 174 Neb. 612, 119 N.W.2d 72 (1963).